Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.079

Infamous crime.

An "infamous crime" is a crime punishable by death in the state penitentiary or imprisonment in a state or federal correctional facility. Neither an adjudication in juvenile court pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW, nor a conviction for a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, is an "infamous crime."

[ 2013 c 11 s 3; 2009 c 369 s 1; 2003 c 111 s 114. Prior: 1992 c 7 s 31; 1965 c 9 s 29.01.080; prior: Code 1881 s 3054; 1865 p 25 s 5; RRS s 5113. Formerly RCW 29.01.080.]

NOTES:

Contests, conviction of felony without reversal or restoration of civil rights as grounds for: RCW 29A.68.020.

Denial of civil rights for conviction of infamous crime: State Constitution Art. 6 s 3.